District of Columbia statutes.
22-3226.15

General disclosures.

(a)

Within the first 30 seconds of a telephone call, the telephone solicitor shall identify himself or herself by stating his or her true name, the company on whose behalf the solicitation is being made, and the goods or services to be sold.

(b)

Any person who violates this section shall be subject to civil penalties pursuant to § 22-3226.09.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 126o
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 102, 47 DCR 7039